Missouri, session 2026, HB2413.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 198.073 and 335.081, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 198.073 and 335.081, to read as follows:
198.073. 1. A residential care facility shall admit or retain only those persons who
are capable mentally and physically of negotiating a normal path to safety using assistive
devices or aids when necessary, and who may need assisted personal care within the
limitations of such facilities, and who do not require hospitalization or skilled nursing care.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of this section, those persons
previously qualified for residence who may have a temporary period of incapacity due to
illness, surgery, or injury, which period does not exceed forty-five days, may be allowed to
remain in a residential care facility or assisted living facility if approved by a physician.
3. Any facility licensed as a residential care facility II on August 27, 2006, shall be
granted a license as an assisted living facility, as defined in section 198.006, on August 28,
2006, regardless of the laws, rules, and regulations for licensure as an assisted living facility
as long as such facility continues to meet all laws, rules, and regulations that were in place on
August 27, 2006, for a residential care facility II. At such time that the average total
reimbursement, not including residents' cost-of-living increases in their benefits from the
Social Security Administration after August 28, 2006, for the care of persons eligible for
Medicaid in an assisted living facility is equal to or exceeds forty-one dollars per day, all
facilities with a license as an assisted living facility shall meet all laws, rules, and regulations
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2413 2
for licensure as an assisted living facility. Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow
any facility that has not met the requirements of subsections 4 and 6 of this section to care for
any individual with a physical, cognitive, or other impairment that prevents the individual
from safely evacuating the facility.
4. Any facility licensed as an assisted living facility, as defined in section 198.006,
except for facilities licensed under subsection 3 of this section, may admit or retain an
individual for residency in an assisted living facility only if the individual does not require
hospitalization or skilled nursing placement, and only if the facility:
(1) Provides for or coordinates oversight and services to meet the needs of the
resident as documented in a written contract signed by the resident, or legal representative of
the resident;
(2) Has twenty-four-hour staff appropriate in numbers and with appropriate skills to
provide such services;
(3) Has a written plan for the protection of all residents in the event of a disaster,
including keeping residents in place, evacuating residents to areas of refuge, evacuating
residents from the building if necessary, or other methods of protection based on the disaster
and the individual building design;
(4) Completes a pre-move-in screening with participation of the prospective resident;
(5) Completes for each resident a community-based assessment, as defined in
subdivision (7) of section 198.006:
(a) Upon admission;
(b) At least semiannually; and
(c) Whenever a significant change has occurred in the resident's condition which may
require a change in services;
(6) Based on the assessment in subsection 7 of this section and subdivision (5) of this
subsection, develops an individualized service plan in partnership with the resident, or legal
representative of the resident, that outlines the needs and preferences of the resident. The
individualized service plan will be reviewed with the resident, or legal representative of the
resident, at least annually, or when there is a significant change in the resident's condition
which may require a change in services. The signatures of an authorized representative of the
facility and the resident, or the resident's legal representative, shall be contained on the
individualized service plan to acknowledge that the service plan has been reviewed and
understood by the resident or legal representative;
(7) Makes available and implements self-care, productive and leisure activity
programs which maximize and encourage the resident's optimal functional ability;
(8) Ensures that the residence does not accept or retain a resident who:

HB 2413 3
(a) Has exhibited behaviors that present a reasonable likelihood of serious harm to
himself or herself or others;
(b) Requires physical restraint;
(c) Requires chemical restraint. As used in this paragraph, the following terms mean:
a. "Chemical restraint", a psychopharmacologic drug that is used for discipline or
convenience and not required to treat medical symptoms;
b. "Convenience", any action taken by the facility to control resident behavior or
maintain residents with a lesser amount of effort by the facility and not in the resident's best
interest;
c. "Discipline", any action taken by the facility for the purpose of punishing or
penalizing residents;
(d) Requires skilled nursing services as defined in subdivision (23) of section 198.006
for which the facility is not licensed or able to provide;
(e) Requires more than one person to simultaneously physically assist the resident
with any activity of daily living, with the exception of bathing and transferring;
(f) Is bed-bound or similarly immobilized due to a debilitating or chronic condition;
and
(9) Develops and implements a plan to protect the rights, privacy, and safety of all
residents and to protect against the financial exploitation of all residents;
(10) Complies with the training requirements of subsection 7 of section 192.2000.
5. Exceptions to paragraphs (d) to (f) of subdivision (8) of subsection 4 of this section
shall be made for residents on hospice, provided the resident, designated representative, or
both, and the assisted living provider, physician, and licensed hospice provider all agree that
such program of care is appropriate for the resident.
6. If an assisted living facility accepts or retains any individual with a physical,
cognitive, or other impairment that prevents the individual from safely evacuating the facility
with minimal assistance, the facility shall:
(1) Have sufficient staff present and awake twenty-four hours a day to assist in the
evacuation;
(2) Include an individualized evacuation plan in the service plan of the resident; and
(3) Take necessary measures to provide residents with the opportunity to explore the
facility and, if appropriate, its grounds; and
(4) Use a personal electronic monitoring device for any resident whose physician
recommends the use of such device.
7. An individual admitted or readmitted to the facility shall have an admission
physical examination by a licensed physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or
physician assistant. Documentation should be obtained prior to admission but shall be on

HB 2413 4
file not later than ten days after admission and shall contain information regarding the
individual's current medical status and any special orders or procedures that should be
followed. If the individual is admitted directly from a hospital or another long-term care
facility and is accompanied on admission by a report that reflects his or her current medical
status, an admission physical shall not be required.
8. Facilities licensed as an assisted living facility shall disclose to a prospective
resident, or legal representative of the resident, information regarding the services the facility
is able to provide or coordinate, the costs of such services to the resident, and the resident
conditions that will require discharge or transfer, including the provisions of subdivision (8)
100 of subsection 4 of this section.
101 9. After January 1, 2008, no entity shall hold itself out as an assisted living facility or
102 advertise itself as an assisted living facility without obtaining a license from the department to
103 operate as an assisted living facility. Any residential care facility II licensed under this
104 chapter that does not use the term assisted living in the name of its licensed facility on or
105 before May 1, 2006, shall be prohibited from using such term after August 28, 2006, unless
106 such facility meets the requirements for an assisted living facility in subsection 4 of this
107 section. Any facility licensed as an intermediate care facility prior to August 28, 2006, that
108 provides the services of an assisted living facility, as described in paragraphs (a), (b), and (c)
109 of subdivision (6) of section 198.006, utilizing the social model of care, may advertise itself
110 as an assisted living facility without obtaining a license from the department to operate as an
111 assisted living facility.
112 10. The department of health and senior services shall promulgate rules to ensure
113 compliance with this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
114 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective
115 only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
116 section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
117 vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
118 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant
119 of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2006, shall be
120 invalid and void.
335.081. So long as the person involved does not represent or hold himself or herself
out as a nurse licensed to practice in this state, no provision of sections 335.011 to 335.096
shall be construed as prohibiting:
(1) The practice of any profession for which a license is required and issued pursuant
to the laws of this state by a person duly licensed to practice that profession;
(2) The services rendered by technicians, nurses' aides or their equivalent trained and
employed in public or private hospitals and licensed long-term care facilities except the

HB 2413 5
services rendered in licensed long-term care facilities shall be limited to administering
medication, excluding the administration of medications by an injectable route other than:
(a) Insulin; and
(b) Subcutaneous injectable medications, provided that any such medication was
prescribed by the physician for the long-term care facility resident who receives the
medication;
(3) The providing of nursing care by friends or members of the family of the person
receiving such care;
(4) The incidental care of the sick, aged, or infirm by domestic servants or persons
primarily employed as housekeepers;
(5) The furnishing of nursing assistance in the case of an emergency situation;
(6) The practice of nursing under proper supervision:
(a) As a part of the course of study by students enrolled in approved schools of
professional nursing or in schools of practical nursing;
(b) By graduates of accredited nursing programs pending the results of the first
licensing examination or ninety days after graduation, whichever first occurs;
(c) A graduate nurse who is prevented from attending the first licensing examination
following graduation by reason of active duty in the military may practice as a graduate nurse
pending the results of the first licensing examination scheduled by the board following the
release of such graduate nurse from active military duty or pending the results of the first
licensing examination taken by the graduate nurse while involved in active military service
whichever comes first;
(7) The practice of nursing in this state by any legally qualified nurse duly licensed to
practice in another state whose engagement requires such nurse to accompany and care for a
patient temporarily residing in this state for a period not to exceed six months;
(8) The practice of any legally qualified nurse who is employed by the government of
the United States or any bureau, division or agency thereof, while in the discharge of his or
her official duties or to the practice of any legally qualified nurse serving in the Armed Forces
of the United States while stationed within this state;
(9) Nonmedical nursing care of the sick with or without compensation when done in
connection with the practice of the religious tenets of any church by adherents thereof, as long
as they do not engage in the practice of nursing as defined in sections 335.011 to 335.096;
(10) The practice of any legally qualified and licensed nurse of another state, territory,
or foreign country whose responsibilities include transporting patients into, out of, or through

HB 2413 6
this state while actively engaged in patient transport that does not exceed forty-eight hours in
this state.
✔